Arkansas, session 2025, HB1704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-13-110 is amended to read as follows:
9-13-110. Parents who are members of armed forces or are first
responders — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Armed forces” means the National Guard and the reserve
components of the armed forces, the United States Army, the United States
Navy, the United States Marine Corps, the United States Coast Guard, the
United States Air Force, and any other branch of the military and naval
forces or auxiliaries of the United States or Arkansas; and
(2) "First responder" means a firefighter, emergency medical
technician, paramedic, or a certified law enforcement officer; and
(2)(3) “Mobilized parent” means a parent who:
(A) Is a member of the armed forces; and
(B) Is called to active duty or receives orders for duty
that is outside the state or country.
(b) A court shall not permanently modify an order for child custody or
*LJH189*
03-13-2025 10:09:57 LJH189

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1704
visitation solely on the basis that one (1) of the parents is a mobilized
parent or based upon the work schedule of a parent who is a first responder.
(c)(1) A court of competent jurisdiction shall determine whether a
temporary modification to an order for child custody or visitation is
appropriate for a child or children of a mobilized parent or a parent who is
a first responder.
(2)(A) The determination under this subsection (c) includes
consideration of any and all circumstances that are necessary to maximize the
mobilized parent's time and contact a mobilized parent has with his or her
child that is consistent with the best interest of the child, including
without limitation:
(A)(1) The ordered length of the mobilized parent's call
to active duty;
(B)(2) The mobilized parent's duty station or stations;
(C)(3) The opportunity that the mobilized parent will have
for contact with the child through a leave, a pass, or other authorized
absence from duty;
(D)(4) The contact that the mobilized parent has had with
the child before the call to active military duty;
(E)(5) The nature of the military mission, if known; and
(F)(6) Any other factor that the court deems appropriate
under the circumstances.
(B) The determination under this subsection includes
consideration of any circumstances that are necessary to maximize the time
and contact a parent who is a first responder has with his or her child that
is consistent with the best interest of the child.
(d) This section shall not limit the power of a court of competent
jurisdiction to permanently modify an order of child custody or visitation in
the event that a parent volunteers for permanent military duty as a career
choice regardless of whether the parent volunteered for permanent military
duty while a member of the armed forces.

/s/Andrews



03-13-2025 10:09:57 LJH189